Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 26.3 Distributed Generation Interconnection

39-26.3-1.
Policy objective.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the expeditious completion of the application process for renewable distributed generation is in the public interest. For this reason, certain standards and other provisions for the processing of applications are hereby set forth to assure that the application process assists in the development of renewable generation resources in a timely manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 144, § 1.

39-26.3-2.
Definitions.

The following terms shall have the meanings given below for purposes of this chapter:

“Applicant” means an electric distribution customer or distributed-generation developer who submits an application to the electric distribution company for the installation of a renewable distributed-generation interconnection to the distribution system for a renewable distributed-generation project that, as contemplated, meets the eligibility requirements for net metering contained within this title or the eligibility requirements for a standard contract contained within this title.

“Feasibility study” means a high-level project assessment that includes an estimate of the cost of interconnecting to the distribution system that would be assessed on the applicant for an interconnection. The estimate is not based on any engineering study, but is based on past experience and judgment of the electric distribution company, taking into account the information in the application, the location of the interconnection, and general knowledge of the distribution and transmission system. The estimate cannot be relied upon by the applicant for purposes of holding the electric distribution company liable or responsible for its accuracy as long as the electric distribution company has provided the estimate in good faith. The feasibility study estimate shall be a range within which the electric distribution company believes the interconnection costs are likely to be and shall include a disclaimer that explains the nature of the estimate.

“Feasibility study fee” means a fee that shall be charged to the applicant to obtain a feasibility study as specified in §

39-26.3-4

.

“Impact study” means an engineering study that includes an estimate of the cost of interconnecting to the distribution system that would be assessed on the applicant for an interconnection that is based on an engineering study of the details of the proposed generation project. The estimate generally will have a probability of accuracy of plus or minus twenty-five percent (25%). The estimate may be relied upon by the applicant for purposes of determining the expected cost of interconnection, but the distribution company may not be held liable or responsible if the actual costs exceed the estimate as long as the estimate was provided in good faith and the interconnection was implemented prudently by the electric distribution company.

“Impact study fee” means a fee that shall be charged to the applicant to obtain an impact study as specified in §

39-26.3-4

.

“Renewable energy resource” means those resources set forth in §

39-26-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 176, § 1.

39-26.3-3.
Application process.

The application process set out in this section shall be applicable to electric distribution companies thirty (30) days after the enactment of this chapter.

An applicant for a renewable distributed-generation interconnection must submit an application to the electric distribution company for an impact study, including a request for an estimate of the cost of interconnecting the renewable distributed-generation resource to the distribution system. The applicant may request a feasibility study prior to requesting an impact study, but the applicant is not required to do so and may submit an application for an impact study without having obtained a feasibility study. The distribution company shall follow the schedule below for all applications.

Upon receipt of a completed application requesting a feasibility study and receipt of the applicable feasibility study fee, the electric distribution company shall provide a feasibility study to the applicant within thirty (30) days.

Upon receipt of a completed application requesting an impact study and receipt of the applicable impact study fee, the electric distribution company shall provide an impact study within ninety (90) days.

In anticipation of the electric distribution company needing to add resources that are not currently in Rhode Island or covered in rates, to provide the necessary services to advance the aggressive goals and objectives set forth in this title, the electric distribution company shall be authorized to add up to two (2) incremental employee resources located in Rhode Island that shall be primarily dedicated to servicing Rhode Island applicants and customers in connection with net metering and the development of distributed-generation resources, including the requisite resources to perform impact and feasibility studies for distributed-generation interconnections and to assure that feasibility studies and impact studies, as well as other engineering activity necessary to facilitate the completion of distributed-generation projects in Rhode Island, are implemented and delivered on a timely basis. Prior to new rates going into effect following the company’s next general rate case filing, the cost of the incremental employee resources shall be recovered through rates on an annual basis through an annual reconciliation mechanism, provided that the total amount of fees collected from impact studies and feasibility studies shall be netted against such costs. Only the cost of time and work actually spent on Rhode Island renewable energy project matters shall be included in the annual reconciliation. The commission shall have the authority to review these positions in the electric distribution company’s next general rate case as a cost of service in the same manner as it reviews all other expenses in a rate case to determine whether they should continue. Nothing contained in this section shall preclude the electric distribution company from adding additional resources, subject to commission approval.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the application process and fees set forth in this chapter apply only to interconnections to the distribution system by renewable distributed-generation resources. To the extent that a renewable generation resource seeks an interconnection to the transmission system and the interconnection request is governed by rules and regulations under the exclusive jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply.

The rules and fees established in this chapter shall be incorporated within the applicable “Standards for Interconnection of Distributed Generation” approved by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 144, § 1.

39-26.3-4.
Study cost fees.

After thirty (30) days from the enactment of this chapter until the end of calendar year 2012, the feasibility study fee shall be in accordance with the schedule set forth below:

Residential applicants for interconnections of UL 1741.1 approved renewable distributed generation that is twenty-five kilowatts (25 KW) or less: zero dollars ($0).

Residential applicants for interconnections of UL 1741.1 approved renewable distributed generation that is greater than twenty-five kilowatts (25 KW): fifty dollars ($50.00).

Nonresidential applicants for interconnections of UL 1741.1 approved renewable distributed generation that is one hundred kilowatts (100 KW) or less: one hundred dollars ($100).

Nonresidential applicants for interconnections of UL 1741.1 approved renewable distributed generation that is two hundred fifty kilowatts (250 KW) or less: three hundred dollars ($300).

Nonresidential applicants for interconnections of renewable distributed generation that is greater than two hundred fifty kilowatts (250 KW), up to one megawatt (1 MW): one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Nonresidential applicants for interconnections of renewable distributed generation greater than one megawatt (1 MW): two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

Beginning January 1, 2013, and for every year thereafter, the commission shall set a new fee schedule that is no less than what is specified herein. The purpose of the fee schedule is to provide a disincentive to applicants contemplating a renewable distributed-generation project from requesting order of magnitude estimates unless they are serious about pursuing such projects.

After thirty (30) days from the enactment of this chapter until the end of calendar year 2012, the impact study fee shall be in accordance with the schedule set forth below:

Residential applicants for interconnections of UL 1741.1 approved renewable distributed generation that is twenty-five kilowatts (25 KW) or less: zero dollars ($0).

Residential applicants for interconnections of UL 1741.1 approved renewable distributed generation that is greater than twenty-five kilowatts (25 KW): one hundred dollars ($100).

Nonresidential applicants for interconnections of UL 1741.1 approved renewable distributed generation that is one hundred kilowatts (100 KW) or less: five hundred dollars ($500)

Nonresidential applicants for interconnections of UL 1741.1 approved renewable distributed generation that is two hundred fifty kilowatts (250 KW) or less: one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

Nonresidential applicants for interconnections of renewable distributed generation that is greater than two hundred fifty kilowatts (250 KW), up to one megawatt (1 MW): five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Nonresidential applicants for interconnections of renewable distributed generation greater than one megawatt (1 MW): ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Beginning January 1, 2013, and for every year thereafter, the commission shall set a new fee schedule that is no less than what is specified herein. The purpose of the impact study fee schedule is to assure that an applicant is responsible for paying a reasonable amount of the cost of the study in advance of installing the distributed generation, but that the advance cost is not so high as to discourage an applicant from pursuing a project.

To the extent that an impact study fee established under this section does not cover the reasonable cost of an impact study for a given nonresidential project that commences operation, the balance of these costs shall be recovered from such applicant through billings after the project is online. The electric distribution company may, at its sole election, offset net-metering credits or any standard contract payments until the full fee(s) is reimbursed, if it finds it administratively convenient to use that means of billing for the balance of the fee for a given project.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 144, § 1.

39-26.3-4.1.
Interconnection standards.

The electric distribution company may only charge an interconnecting, renewable energy customer for any system modifications to its electric power system specifically necessary for and directly related to the interconnection.

If the public utilities commission determines that a specific system modification benefiting other customers has been accelerated due to an interconnection request, it may order the interconnecting customer to fund the modification subject to repayment of the depreciated value of the modification as of the time the modification would have been necessary as determined by the public utilities commission. Any system modifications benefiting other customers shall be included in rates as determined by the public utilities commission.

If an interconnecting, renewable energy customer is required to pay for system modifications and a subsequent renewable energy or commercial customer relies on those modifications to connect to the distribution system within ten (10) years of the earlier interconnecting, renewable energy customer’s payment, the subsequent customer will make a prorated contribution toward the cost of the system modifications that will be credited to the earlier interconnecting, renewable energy customer as determined by the public utilities commission.

An electric distribution company shall acknowledge to the interconnecting, renewable energy customer receipt of an application to initiate the interconnection process within three (3) business days of receipt. The electric distribution company shall notify the interconnecting, renewable energy customer in writing within ten (10) business days of receipt that the application is or is not complete and, if not, advise what is missing. Any disputes regarding whether and when an application to initiate the interconnection process is complete shall be resolved expeditiously at the public utilities commission. The maximum time allowed between the date of the completed application and delivery of an executable interconnection service agreement shall be one hundred seventy-five (175) calendar days or two hundred (200) calendar days if a detailed study is required. All electric distribution company system modifications must be completed by the date which is the later of: (1) No longer than two hundred seventy (270) calendar days, or three hundred sixty (360) calendar days if substation work is necessary, from the date of the electric distribution company’s receipt of the interconnecting, renewable energy customer’s executed interconnection service agreement; or (2) The interconnecting, renewable energy customer’s agreed-upon extension of the time between the execution of the interconnection service agreement and interconnection as set forth in writing. All deadlines herein are subject to all payments being made in accordance with the distributed-generation interconnection tariff on file with the public utilities commission and the interconnection service agreement. These system modification deadlines cannot be extended due to customer delays in providing required information, all of which must be requested and obtained before completion of the impact study. The deadlines for completion of system modifications will be extended only to the extent of events that are clearly not under the control of the electric distribution company, such as extended prohibitive weather, union work stoppage or force majeure, or third-party delays, including, without limitation, delays due to ISO-NE requirements not attributable to electric distribution company actions, and that cannot be resolved despite commercially reasonable efforts. The electric distribution company shall notify the customer of the start of any claimed deadline extension as soon as practicable, its cause and when it concludes, all in writing. Any actual damages that a court of competent jurisdiction orders the electric distribution company to pay to an interconnecting, renewable energy customer as a direct result of the electric distribution company’s failure to comply with the requirements of this subsection shall be payable by its shareholders and may not be recovered from customers, provided that the total amount of damages awarded for any and all such claims shall not exceed, in the aggregate, an amount equal to the amount of the incentive the electric distribution company would have earned as provided for in §§

39-26.6-12(j)(3)

and

39-26.1-4

in the year in which the system modifications were required to be completed. In no event shall the electric distribution company be liable to the interconnecting, renewable energy customer for any indirect, incidental, special, consequential, or punitive damages of any kind whatsoever as a result of the electric distribution company’s failure to comply with this section.

On or before September 1, 2017, the public utilities commission shall initiate a docket to establish metrics for the electric distribution company’s performance in meeting the time frames set forth herein and in the distributed-generation interconnection standards approved by the public utilities commission. The public utilities commission may include incentives and penalties in the performance metrics.

The proposed interconnection of any new renewable energy resource that replaces the same existing renewable energy resource of the same or less nameplate capacity that has been in operation in the twelve (12) months preceding notification of the replacement shall be subject to a sixty-day (60) review. The purpose of such sixty-day (60) review is to allow the electric distribution company to determine whether any system modifications are required to support the interconnection of the replacement renewable energy resource. If there is a need for system modifications because of an interconnection policy change implemented by the electric distribution company, then the system modification may be included in rates as determined by the public utilities commission. If there is a need for system modifications only because of a change in the rating or utility disturbance response that adversely affects the impact of the facility on the distribution system, then the interconnecting, renewable energy customer shall be responsible for the cost of the system modifications.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 112, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 176, § 2.

39-26.3-5.
Liberal construction of chapter required.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its policy objective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 144, § 1.

39-26.3-6.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or application of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 144, § 1.